Utah statutes.
26-18b-101.   Organ Donation Contribution Fund created.

(1) (a)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the Organ Donation Contribution Fund.

(b)  The Organ Donation Contribution Fund shall consist of:

(i)  private contributions;

(ii)  donations or grants from public or private entities;

(iii)  voluntary donations collected under Sections 41-1a-230.5 and 53-3-214.7; and

(iv)  interest and earnings on fund money.

(c)  The cost of administering the Organ Donation Contribution Fund shall be paid from money in the fund.

(2)  The Department of Health shall:

(a)  administer the funds deposited in the Organ Donation Contribution Fund;

(b)  select qualified organizations and distribute the funds in the Organ Donation Contribution Fund in accordance with Subsection (3); and

(c)  make an annual report on the fund to the Health and Human Services Appropriations Subcommittee.

(3) (a)  The funds in the Organ Donation Contribution Fund may be distributed to a selected organization that:

(i)  promotes and supports organ donation;

(ii)  assists in maintaining and operating a statewide organ donation registry; and

(iii)  provides donor awareness education.

(b)  An organization that meets the criteria of Subsections (3)(a)(i) through (iii) may apply to the Department of Health, in a manner prescribed by the department, to receive a portion of the money contained in the Organ Donation Contribution Fund.

